New York, session 2025-2026, S2679.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subdivision 13 of section 65 of 2 the public service law, as amended by a chapter of the laws of 2024 3 amending the public service law relating to call centers for gas and 4 electric corporations, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5 8626-A and A. 9444-A, are amended to read as follows: 6 (a) Every gas corporation or electric corporation furnishing utility 7 services shall provide the following call center customer assistance 8 receiving inquiries [and associated office tasks by phone, in writing, 9 or any electronic communication, including but not limited to emails, 10 texts, and chats] by phone or in writing on: customer financial respon- 11 sibility; receiving [application] requests to initiate or terminate 12 service; receiving requests for emergency services; shared metering; 13 determining deposit required or billing rate; receiving meter and 14 service orders and access to meter requests; explaining company rates, 15 regulations, policies, procedures, and common practices; initiating 16 trouble order forms and high bill investigations; inbound and/or 17 outbound handling of payment and other credit arrangements such as 18 obtaining deposits, financial statements and payment plans; collection 19 assistance inquiries and referring customers to social service agencies 20 and other assistance programs. [For purposes of this section, each 21 individual phone call, writing, email, text, chat, or any other communi- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02896-01-5 S. 2679 2 1 cation shall count as an independent instance of customer assistance, 2 and therefore each shall trigger a gas or electric corporation's duties 3 under paragraph (b) of this subdivision.] This paragraph shall not apply 4 to communications between departments to resolve a customer inquiry. For 5 purposes of this section, "collection assistance inquiries" shall not 6 include calls or activities related to the collection of debts that are 7 referred to third-party collection agencies or those involving the 8 direct pursuit of financial recovery on delinquent accounts. 9 (b) [(i)] No gas or electric corporation shall close a call center or 10 other facility providing the customer assistance set forth in paragraph 11 (a) of this subdivision or send such customer assistance outside such 12 gas or electric corporation's New York state service territory or 13 outside of New York state without notice, a hearing and approval before 14 the commission. Upon receipt of the notice required pursuant to this 15 paragraph, the commission shall provide notice of the proceeding to 16 interested parties and the public; and shall promptly fix a date for the 17 commencement of a public hearing thereon not less than sixty days after 18 such receipt. The testimony presented at such hearing may be presented 19 in writing or orally, provided that the commission may make rules 20 designed to exclude repetitive, redundant or irrelevant testimony while 21 giving all interested parties the opportunity to present their documen- 22 tary and/or testimonial evidence. The commission shall make a record of 23 all testimony in all contested hearings. [The commission within thirty 24 days shall approve or deny the closure of a call center or other facili- 25 ty providing customer service or the relocation of customer service 26 assistance inquiries.] For purposes of this section "public hearing" 27 means a public forum at a physical location, attended by commission 28 members or their designees, where oral testimony is accepted and written 29 testimony may be submitted for inclusion in the record. Such forum shall 30 be open to parties to the proceeding and the general public for the 31 presentation of comments that shall be limited to relevant facts direct- 32 ly related to the proceeding in question. Such hearing shall be 33 commenced upon proper notice to the parties to the proceeding and the 34 public at least thirty days prior to the scheduled date. [Such hearing 35 shall be closed after the commission approves or denies the closure of a 36 call center or other facility providing customer service or the relo- 37 cation of customer service assistance inquiries. In no event shall a 38 gas or electric corporation's history of sending customer assistance 39 outside the gas or electric corporation's New York state service terri- 40 tory or outside of New York state be used as justification for doing so 41 after the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand 42 twenty-four that amended this paragraph takes effect.] It shall be 43 permissible for a gas or electric corporation to send customer assist- 44 ance requests outside of such corporation's New York state service 45 territory or outside of New York state in the following circumstances: 46 (i) when a call center or customer assistance facility is unable to 47 adequately respond to customer assistance requests due to natural disas- 48 ter, cyber attack, temporary loss of internet or phone connection or 49 power, a state or local declared emergency that impacts the ability of a 50 call center to manage customer assistance requests, or customer call 51 volume that exceeds the capacity of the call center given normal staff- 52 ing levels; (ii) for the purpose of workforce training; or (iii) to 53 initiate work flexibility policies that allow call center employees to 54 work from an approved alternative worksite other than a call center 55 location[. Provided] provided, however, before a gas or electric corpo- 56 ration can establish policies for any call center employees that are S. 2679 3 1 represented by a bona fide labor organization through a collective 2 bargaining agreement, such policies must have been mutually agreed to by 3 the corporation and the labor organization. Such work flexibility poli- 4 cies shall not [violate] be considered a violation of this section. Any 5 transfer of customer assistance requests outside of New York state or 6 outside of the corporation's New York state service territory pursuant 7 to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall be temporary and only for 8 the duration of the emergency situation. A corporation must notify the 9 commission of any transfers within ten business days following an 10 exemption claimed pursuant to subparagraph (i) of this paragraph. For 11 the purposes of this paragraph, "New York state service territory" shall 12 be understood to refer to the designated geographic area served by the 13 gas or electric corporation in accordance with its legal service obli- 14 gations. The relocation of customer assistance calls to any of the 15 corporation's call centers within New York state in existence prior to 16 the effective date of the chapter of the laws of two thousand twenty- 17 five that amended this paragraph, regardless of the specific service 18 territory, shall not be considered a violation of this paragraph. 19 [(ii) The commission shall make available a form allowing an entity to 20 take an action against a gas or electric corporation that knowingly 21 failed or neglected to obey or comply with this section. Upon receipt of 22 such form, it shall commence a proceeding to determine if a call center 23 or other facility providing customer assistance was closed or customer 24 service assistance inquiries were relocated outside New York state with- 25 out notice, hearing, and approval before the commission. Pursuant to 26 this paragraph, the commission shall provide notice of such proceeding 27 to interested parties and the public and shall promptly fix a date for 28 the commencement of a public hearing thereon not less than sixty days 29 after such receipt. The testimony presented at such hearing may be 30 presented in writing or orally, provided that the commission may make 31 rules designed to exclude repetitive, redundant or irrelevant testimony 32 while giving all parties the opportunity to present their documentary 33 and/or testimonial evidence. The commission shall a make record of all 34 testimony in all contested hearings. The commission shall within thirty 35 days make a determination if such gas or electric corporation was in 36 violation of this section.] 37 § 2. Subdivision 4-a of section 25 of the public service law, as added 38 by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public service law relat- 39 ing to call centers for gas and electric corporations, as proposed in 40 legislative bills numbers S. 8626-A and A. 9444-A, is REPEALED. 41 § 3. Section 4 of a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public 42 service law relating to call centers for gas and electric corporations, 43 as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 8626-A and A. 9444-A, is 44 amended to read as follows: 45 § 4. This act shall take effect [immediately] on the one hundred 46 eightieth day after it shall have become a law and shall apply to all 47 actions or proceedings commenced on or after the effective date of this 48 act. 49 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 50 sections one and two shall take effect on the same date and in the same 51 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the public service law 52 relating to call centers for gas and electric corporations, as proposed 53 in legislative bills numbers S. 8626-A and A. 9444-A, takes effect.